Wisconsin, session 2025, AB133.
do enact as follows:AB133,11Section 1. 408.110 (2) (intro.) of the statutes is renumbered 408.110 (2) and 2amended to read:AB133,2,43408.110 (2) The local law of the securities intermediary’s entitlement holder’s 4jurisdiction, as specified in sub. (5), governs:.AB133,25Section 2. 408.110 (2) (a), (b), (c) and (d) of the statutes are repealed.AB133,36Section 3. 408.110 (5) and (6) of the statutes are repealed.AB133,47Section 4. 408.503 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB133,3,58408.503 (1) To the extent necessary for a securities intermediary to satisfy all 1security entitlements with respect to a particular financial asset, all interests in 2that financial asset held by the securities intermediary are held by the securities 3intermediary for the entitlement holders, are not property of the securities 4intermediary, and are not subject to claims of creditors of the securities 5intermediary, except as otherwise provided in s. 408.511.AB133,56Section 5. 408.511 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 408.511 and amended to 7read:AB133,3,148408.511 Priority among security interests and entitlement holders. 9Except as otherwise provided in subs. (2) and (3), if If a securities intermediary does 10not have sufficient interests in a particular financial asset to satisfy both its 11obligations to entitlement holders who have security entitlements to that financial 12asset and its obligation to a creditor of the securities intermediary who has a 13security interest in that financial asset, the claims of entitlement holders, other 14than the creditor, have priority over the claim of the creditor.AB133,615Section 6. 408.511 (2) and (3) of the statutes are repealed.AB133,716Section 7. 409.305 (1) (c) of the statutes is repealed.AB133,817Section 8. Initial applicability.AB133,3,1918(1) This act first applies to security interests perfected on the effective date of 19this subsection.AB133,920Section 9. Effective date.AB133,3,2221(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 4th month beginning after 22publication.AB133,3,2323